Indiana, session 2026, HB1065.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-14-1-14.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A person who
recklessly violates IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a
committee with the personal funds of an officer, a member, or an
associate of the committee commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates
IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a committee with the
personal funds of an officer, a member, or an associate of the
committee commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in subsection (b) is a Level 6 felony if
a person commingles at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of
committee funds with the personal funds of an officer, a member,
or an associate of the committee.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-146.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 146.5. "Gratuity", for purposes
of IC 35-44.1-1-2.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-44.1-1-2.5.
HB 1065—LS 6334/DI 107


SECTION 3. IC 35-44.1-1-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. (a) As used in this section,
"gratuity" means a payment made to a public servant after an
official act as a reward or token of appreciation. However, the
term does not include:
(1) a good or service that is:
(A) subject to a reporting requirement; or
(B) otherwise authorized;
under a rule or code of ethics that applies to the donor or
public servant;
(2) a good or service having a de minimis value of less than
one hundred dollars ($100);
(3) an item that is primarily ceremonial or commemorative,
such as a plaque, trophy, certificate, framed photo, or similar
item;
(4) a political contribution subject to IC 3-9-2 that is reported
in accordance with applicable law;
(5) salary, wages, a bonus, or any other form of work related
compensation:
(A) from the governmental entity that employs the public
servant; and
(B) that the public servant is legally authorized to receive;
or
(6) an offer of employment that is not offered as a reward for
an official act performed by a public servant.
(b) As used in this section, "public servant" includes a former
public servant.
(c) A person who provides a gratuity to a public servant, with
the intent to reward the public servant for an official act
performed by the public servant for the person in the public
servant's official capacity, commits providing an unlawful gratuity
to a public servant, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the offense
is a Level 6 felony if the fair market value of the gratuity is at least
seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).
(d) A public servant who:
(1) solicits or accepts a gratuity from another person; and
(2) either:
(A) solicits the gratuity as a reward for; or
(B) knows or reasonably should know that the gratuity is
offered as a reward for;
an official act performed by the public servant for the person
HB 1065—LS 6334/DI 107


in the public servant's official capacity;
commits soliciting or accepting an unlawful gratuity, a Class A
misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 6 felony if the fair
market value of the gratuity is at least seven hundred fifty dollars
($750).
HB 1065—LS 6334/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Courts and Criminal Code, to
which was referred House Bill 1065, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the House with
the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 3-14-1-14.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A person who
recklessly violates IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a
committee with the personal funds of an officer, a member, or an
associate of the committee commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates
IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a committee with the
personal funds of an officer, a member, or an associate of the
committee commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in subsection (b) is a Level 6 felony if
a person commingles at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of
committee funds with the personal funds of an officer, a member,
or an associate of the committee.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1065 as introduced.)
MCNAMARA
Committee Vote: yeas 13, nays 0.
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1065 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, line 18, delete "or".
Page 2, line 23, delete "receive." and insert "receive; or
(6) an offer of employment that is not offered as a reward for
an official act performed by a public servant.".
Page 2, line 28, after "servant" insert "for the person".
Page 2, line 39, after "servant" insert "for the person".
HB 1065—LS 6334/DI 107


(Reference is to HB 1065 as printed January 22, 2026.)
SLAGER
HB 1065—LS 6334/DI 107